Missouri, session 2026, HB2967.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 610, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 610.144, to read as follows:
610.144. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri
Expungement Fund", which shall consist of moneys deposited into the fund from any
source including, but not limited to, gifts, donations, grants, and bequests. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180,
the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and,
upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided in subsection 2
of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
2. The office of state courts administrator, the department of public safety, and
the information technology services division within the office of administration shall
expend moneys from the fund, upon appropriation, on the statewide court automation
system and the Missouri criminal history record information system established under
sections 43.500 to 43.530 for one or more of the following purposes:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2967 2
(1) Expenses that may be incurred to develop, establish, maintain, or operate
any information technology equipment, software, systems, or services associated with
the expungement or closing of records under Missouri law, including the development
and implementation of any technology-assisted, state-initiated bulk expungement or
sealing of records under Missouri law; or
(2) The cost of necessary personnel or contractors.
✔